North Dakota, session 69, HB1568.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 54 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
North Dakota Ireland trade commission - Membership .
1. The North Dakota Ireland trade commission s shall :
a. Advance bilateral trade and investment between the state and Ireland;
b. Initiate joint action on issues of mutual interest to the state and Ireland;
c. Promote business and academic exchanges between the state and Ireland;
d. Encourage mutual economic support between the state and Ireland;
e. Encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure of the state and Ireland; and
f. Address any other issues deemed to be of mutual benefit to the state and
Ireland.
2. The North Dakota Ireland trade commission consists of :
a. Two members of the senate, appointed by the president pro tempore of the
senate;
b. Two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the
house;
c. The executive director of the North Dakota trade office;
d. An individual knowledgeable of and interested in the promotion of international
trade, appointed by the executive director of the North Dakota trade office; and
e. The agriculture commissioner, or the commissioner's designee.
Page No. 1 25.0954.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
3. Each appointed member shall serve for a term of two years. If a position becomes
vacant, the position must be filled for the duration of the term in the same manner as
the original appointment.
4. At the initial meeting of the commission and annually thereafter, the members shall
select one from among the four appointed legislators to serve as the chair.
Administration - Meetings - Reimbursement.
1. The North Dakota trade office shall provide administrative services to the North
Dakota Ireland trade commission and compensation under subsection 3 .
2. The commission shall meet two to four times per year, as deemed necessary by the
chair, at the call of the chair.
3. Each member of the North Dakota Ireland trade commission may be reimbursed upon
request for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the member's duties at
the rate provided for members of the legislative assembly under subsection 1 o f
section 54 - 03 - 20 .
Report to legislative management.
On or before September first of each year, the North Dakota Ireland trade commission shal l
provide a report to the legislative management. The report must include:
1. A description of the commission's work;
2. A description of benefits to the state, and to sectors involved in international trade,
attributable to the commission's efforts;
3. Recommendations for legislation that would support trade between the state and
Ireland; and
4. A summary of anticipated commission activities in the following year.
Page No. 2 25.0954.02000